Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-140
Mortgage loan originator; registration.

Any financial institution chartered by the department that employs a mortgage loan originator, as defined in section 45-702, shall register such employee with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, as defined in section 45-702, by furnishing the following information concerning the employee's identity to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry:

(1) Fingerprints for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive such information, for a state and national criminal history background check; and

(2) Personal history and experience, including authorization for the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to obtain information related to any administrative, civil, or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

Laws 2017, LB140, § 37.